Utah statutes.
72-5-108.   Width of rights-of-way for public highways.

The width of rights-of-way for public highways shall be set as the highway authorities of the state, counties, or municipalities may determine for the highways under their respective jurisdiction.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

